Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 2

State Safety Oversight Program

13-10-201. Responsibility for implementation.

The department is designated as the agency responsible for implementing a state safety oversight program that satisfies the requirements of 49 U.S.C. § 5329(e) and shall have the authority to implement all requirements necessary to comply with 49 U.S.C. § 5329(e) and the implementing federal regulations.

The department may enter into an agreement with one (1) or more contractors to act on behalf of the department in carrying out the duties of the department under this part. However, any such contractor may not provide services to both the department and a rail fixed guideway public transportation system under the oversight of the department, unless authorized by a waiver issued by the federal transit administrator or the administrator's designee.

Acts 2018, ch. 743, § 2.

13-10-202. Financial and legal independence.

Unless waived under 49 U.S.C. § 5329(e), the department:

Shall be financially and legally independent from any rail fixed guideway public transportation system under the oversight of the department;

May not employ an individual who is also employed by a rail fixed guideway public transportation system under the oversight of the department; and

May not directly provide public transportation services in an area with a rail fixed guideway public transportation system under the oversight of the department.

A rail fixed guideway public transportation system under the oversight of the department may not provide funding to the department in a manner prohibited by the federal transit administration.

Acts 2018, ch. 743, § 2.

13-10-203. Enforcement authority.

The department shall oversee and have the authority to implement all safety aspects of rail fixed guideway public transportation systems in accordance with 49 U.S.C. § 5329(e), including:

Investigation and enforcement of federal and state laws regarding rail fixed guideway public transportation safety;

Establishment of minimum safety standards for the rail fixed guideway public transportation systems in the state;

Review, approval, oversight, and enforcement of the public transportation agency safety plan required under 49 U.S.C. § 5329(d), including implementation by a rail fixed guideway public transportation system of the system's plan; and

Oversight and enforcement of corrective action by rail fixed guideway public transportation systems in a manner directed by the commissioner or commissioner's designee as needed, including compelling the removal of a specific hazard, immediately suspending or prohibiting rail service as appropriate, or taking other action consistent with this purpose.

The department shall have the right to access the property, vehicles, accident scenes, and records of each rail fixed guideway public transportation system under the oversight of the department for the purpose of fulfilling its duties under this part.

Acts 2018, ch. 743, § 2.

13-10-204. Confidentiality of information.

The data collected for and reports concerning investigations conducted under this part by the department, or a contractor acting on behalf of the department, shall be confidential and not open for inspection by members of the public pursuant to the open records law, compiled in title 10, chapter 7, and may not be admitted into evidence or used in a civil action for damages resulting from a matter mentioned in such a report.

Any portion of a rail fixed guideway public transportation system safety plan that concerns security for the system shall be confidential and not open for inspection by members of the public pursuant to the open records law.

Acts 2018, ch. 743, § 2.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

13-10-205. Audits and reporting.

At least once every three (3) years, the department shall audit each rail fixed guideway public transportation system's compliance with the public transportation agency safety plan as required by 49 U.S.C. § 5329(e).

At least once per year, the department shall report the status of the safety of each rail fixed guideway public transportation system to the governor, the federal transit administration, and the board of directors, or equivalent, of the rail fixed guideway public transportation system.

Acts 2018, ch. 743, § 2.

13-10-206. Authority to adopt policies and regulations.

The department is authorized to establish policies and promulgate rules and regulations in furtherance of this part. All rules shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2018, ch. 743, § 2.

13-10-104. Authority of commissioner to inspect property and records and conduct investigations and hearings.

13-10-107. State financial assistance — Contingencies.